Arkansas statutes. Title 28 Wills, Estates, and Fiduciary Relationships
Chapter 73 Arkansas Trust Code
28-73-1008. Exculpation of trustee.

A term of a trust relieving a trustee of liability for breach of trust is unenforceable to the extent that it:

relieves the trustee of liability for breach of trust committed in bad faith or with reckless indifference to the purposes of the trust or the interests of the beneficiaries; or

was inserted as the result of an abuse by the trustee of a fiduciary or confidential relationship to the settlor.

An exculpatory term drafted or caused to be drafted by the trustee is invalid as an abuse of a fiduciary or confidential relationship unless the trustee proves that the exculpatory term is fair under the circumstances and that its existence and contents were adequately communicated to the settlor.

This section applies only to irrevocable trusts created on or after September 1, 2005, and to revocable trusts which become irrevocable on or after September 1, 2005.

Ark. L. Notes.

Circo, How Does the Arkansas Trust Code Affect Real Estate Transactions?, 2007 Ark. L. Notes 45.

Circuit court abused its discretion when it granted defendant trustee's motion to dismiss as it did not look at the factual allegations contained in the amended complaint or consider plaintiff's arguments concerning whether the share-cancellation provision was unenforceable under this section; instead, the circuit court took the view that the mere filing of a lawsuit challenging the trustee's actions triggered the share-cancellation provision without regard to whether the trustee was acting in bad faith or with reckless indifference.Peck v. Peck, 2016 Ark. App. 423, 502 S.W.3d 553 (2016).

History.

Acts 2005, No. 1031, § 1.

28-73-1009. Beneficiary's consent, release, or ratification.

A trustee is not liable to a beneficiary for breach of trust if the beneficiary consented to the conduct constituting the breach, released the trustee from liability for the breach, or ratified the transaction constituting the breach, unless:

the consent, release, or ratification of the beneficiary was induced by improper conduct of the trustee; or

at the time of the consent, release, or ratification, the beneficiary did not know of the beneficiary's rights or of the material facts relating to the breach.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 1031, § 1.

28-73-1010. Limitation on personal liability of trustee.

Except as otherwise provided in the contract, a trustee is not personally liable on a contract properly entered into in the trustee's fiduciary capacity in the course of administering the trust if the trustee in the contract disclosed the fiduciary capacity.

A trustee is personally liable for torts committed in the course of administering a trust, or for obligations arising from ownership or control of trust property, including liability for violation of environmental law, only if the trustee is personally at fault.

A claim based on a contract entered into by a trustee in the trustee's fiduciary capacity, on an obligation arising from ownership or control of trust property, or on a tort committed in the course of administering a trust, may be asserted in a judicial proceeding against the trustee in the trustee's fiduciary capacity, whether or not the trustee is personally liable for the claim.

Ark. L. Notes.

Circo, How Does the Arkansas Trust Code Affect Real Estate Transactions?, 2007 Ark. L. Notes 45.

If the trustee of a revocable trust holds an interest as a general partner, the settlor is personally liable for contracts and other obligations of the partnership as if the settlor were a general partner.

Comparable protective provisions of other laws relating to commercial transactions or transfer of securities by fiduciaries prevail over the protection provided by this section.

Ark. L. Notes.

Circo, How Does the Arkansas Trust Code Affect Real Estate Transactions?, 2007 Ark. L. Notes 45.

a statement that the trust exists and the date the trust instrument was executed;

the identity of the settlor;

the identity and address of the currently acting trustee;

the powers of the trustee;

the revocability or irrevocability of the trust and the identity of any person holding a power to revoke the trust;

the authority of cotrustees to sign or otherwise authenticate and whether all or less than all are required in order to exercise powers of the trustee; and

the manner of taking title to trust property.

A person who acts in reliance upon a certification of trust without knowledge that the representations contained therein are incorrect is not liable to any person for so acting and may assume without inquiry the existence of the facts contained in the certification.

Knowledge of the terms of the trust may not be inferred solely from the fact that a copy of all or part of the trust instrument is held by the person relying upon the certification.

A person who in good faith enters into a transaction in reliance upon a certification of trust may enforce the transaction against the trust property as if the representations contained in the certification were correct.

A person making a demand for the trust instrument in addition to a certification of trust or excerpts is liable for damages if a court determines that the person did not act in good faith in demanding the trust instrument.

This section does not limit the right of a person to obtain a copy of the trust instrument in a judicial proceeding concerning the trust.

Ark. L. Notes.

Circo, How Does the Arkansas Trust Code Affect Real Estate Transactions?, 2007 Ark. L. Notes 45.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 1031, § 1.

28-73-1011. Interest as general partner.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (c) or unless personal liability is imposed in the contract, a trustee who holds an interest as a general partner in a general or limited partnership is not personally liable on a contract entered into by the partnership after the trust's acquisition of the interest if the fiduciary capacity was disclosed in the contract or in a statement previously filed pursuant to the Uniform Partnership Act (1996), §4-46-101 et seq., or the Revised Limited Partnership Act of 1991, §4-43-101 et seq. [repealed].

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (c), a trustee who holds an interest as a general partner is not personally liable for torts committed by the partnership or for obligations arising from ownership or control of the interest unless the trustee is personally at fault.

The immunity provided by this section does not apply if an interest in the partnership is held by the trustee in a capacity other than that of trustee or is held by the trustee's spouse or one (1) or more of the trustee's descendants, siblings, or parents, or the spouse of any of them.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 1031, § 1.

28-73-1012. Protection of person dealing with trustee.

A person other than a beneficiary who in good faith assists a trustee, or who in good faith and for value deals with a trustee, without knowledge that the trustee is exceeding or improperly exercising the trustee's powers is protected from liability as if the trustee properly exercised the power.

A person other than a beneficiary who in good faith deals with a trustee is not required to inquire into the extent of the trustee's powers or the propriety of their exercise.

A person who in good faith delivers assets to a trustee need not ensure their proper application.

A person other than a beneficiary who in good faith assists a former trustee, or who in good faith and for value deals with a former trustee without knowledge that the trusteeship has terminated is protected from liability as if the former trustee were still a trustee.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 1031, § 1.

28-73-1013. Certification of trust.

Instead of furnishing a copy of the trust instrument to a person other than a beneficiary, the trustee may furnish to the person a certification of trust containing the following information:

A certification of trust may be signed or otherwise authenticated by any trustee.

A certification of trust must state that the trust has not been revoked, modified, or amended in any manner that would cause the representations contained in the certification of trust to be incorrect.

A certification of trust need not contain the dispositive terms of a trust.

A recipient of a certification of trust may require the trustee to furnish copies of those excerpts from the original trust instrument and later amendments which designate the trustee and confer upon the trustee the power to act in the pending transaction.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 1031, § 1.

Subchapter 11

— Miscellaneous Provisions

28-73-1101. Uniformity of application and construction.

In applying and construing this chapter consideration must be given to the need to promote uniformity of the law with respect to its subject matter among states that enact it.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 1031, § 1.

28-73-1102. Electronic records and signatures.

The provisions of this chapter governing the legal effect, validity, or enforceability of electronic records or electronic signatures, and of contracts formed or performed with the use of such records or signatures, conform to the requirements of Section 102 of the Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act, 15 U.S.C. § 7001 et seq., and supersede, modify, and limit the requirements of the Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act, 15 U.S.C. § 7001 et seq.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 1031, § 1.

28-73-1103. Severability clause.

If any provision of this chapter or its application to any person or circumstances is held invalid, the invalidity does not affect other provisions or applications of this chapter which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this chapter are severable.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 1031, § 1.

28-73-1104. Effective date.

This chapter takes effect on September 1, 2005.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 1031, § 1.

28-73-1105. [Reserved.]

A.C.R.C. Notes. Section 1105 of the Uniform Trust Code (ULA 2005), a repealer provision, was not adopted in Arkansas.

28-73-1106. Application to existing relationships.

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, on September 1, 2005:

this chapter applies to all trusts created before, on, or after September 1, 2005;

this chapter applies to all judicial proceedings concerning trusts commenced on or after September 1, 2005;

this chapter applies to judicial proceedings concerning trusts commenced before September 1, 2005, unless the court finds that application of a particular provision of this chapter would substantially interfere with the effective conduct of the judicial proceedings or prejudice the rights of the parties, in which case the particular provision of this chapter does not apply and the superseded law applies;

any rule of construction or presumption provided in this chapter applies to trust instruments executed before September 1, 2005, unless there is a clear indication of a contrary intent in the terms of the trust; and

an act done before September 1, 2005, is not affected by this chapter.

If a right is acquired, extinguished, or barred upon the expiration of a prescribed period that has commenced to run under any other statute before September 1, 2005, that statute continues to apply to the right even if it has been repealed or superseded.

Ark. L. Notes.

Circo, How Does the Arkansas Trust Code Affect Real Estate Transactions?, 2007 Ark. L. Notes 45.

Because the Board of Trustees of a policemen's pension fund increased benefits to certain retirees in 1996, the Trust Code did not apply; it applied only to acts occurring after September 1, 2005.Bakalekos v. Furlow, 2011 Ark. 505, 385 S.W.3d 810 (2011).

Even though community property was involved, a wife had the authority to amend the family trust after her husband's death where the trust authorized the surviving spouse to amend the trust, and under subsection (a) of this section, the terms of the trust prevailed over §28-73-601(b)(1).Cason v. Lambert, 2015 Ark. App. 41, 454 S.W.3d 250 (2015).

Effective Dates. Acts 2011, No. 159, § 1:Jan. 1, 2012.

Effective Dates. Acts 2011, No. 159, § 1:Jan. 1, 2012.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 1031, § 1.

28-73-504. Discretionary trusts — Effect of standard.